Hawaii, session 2026, HB715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 338, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    .  Commemorative certificates of stillbirth §338-A Commemorative certificates of stillbirth; authorized.  The department of health may issue commemorative certificates of stillbirth; provided that the department has previously filed and prepared a certificate of fetal death for the registrant pursuant to section 338-9. §338-B Fees.  (a)  The fees for a commemorative certificate of stillbirth issued by the department of health pursuant to this part shall be $           for the first copy and $           for each copy issued thereafter. (b)  All fees received of remittances of commemorative certificates of stillbirth shall be deposited into the vital statistics improvement special fund established under section 338-14.6. §338-C Evidentiary character of certificates; absence thereof.  A commemorative certificate of stillbirth issued pursuant to this part shall not be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated and shall have no valid legal standing as a bona fide government record. §338-D Disclaimer.  The department of health shall print on the back of every commemorative certificate of stillbirth issued pursuant to this part a disclaimer in block letters in at least twelve-point type that shall read: "THIS DOCUMENT HAS BEEN ISSUED BY THE HAWAII DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HAS NO PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS THEREIN STATED AND SHALL HAVE NO VALID LEGAL STANDING AS A BONA FIDE GOVERNMENT RECORD."" SECTION 2.  Section 338-14.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  The fund shall consist of fees remitted pursuant to section 338-14.5[.] and 338-B(b).  All realizations of the fund shall be subject to the conditions specified in subsection (b)." SECTION 3.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.